North Dakota, session 69, SB2332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - GRANT FUNDING FOR EMERGENCY
SERVICES AND PUBLIC SAFETY. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall
consider studying options to provide grant funding for emergency services and public safety. The study
must include a review of the amount of grant funding needed, potential funding sources, entities to be
eligible to receive a grant, types of expenses to be eligible for reimbursement through a grant program,
the appropriate agency to administer a grant program, and options to establish a grant program
oversight committee. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations,
together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

S. B. NO. 2332 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2332.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 12 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State